test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ooqrwn_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ǭʼrõn: # Noun 236 'eng /est riie/fin' - full paradigm
     ǭʼrõn+N+Sg+Nom: [ǭʼrõn, ǭrõn]
     ǭʼrõn+N+Sg+Gen: [ǭʼrõn, ǭrõn]
     ǭʼrõn+N+Sg+Par: [ǭʼrõnt, ǭrõnt]
     ǭʼrõn+N+Sg+Dat: [ǭʼrõnõn, ǭrõnõn]
     ǭʼrõn+N+Sg+Ins: [ǭʼrõnõks, ǭrõnõks]
     ǭʼrõn+N+Sg+Ill: [ǭʼrõnõ, ǭrõnõ]
     ǭʼrõn+N+Sg+Ela: [ǭʼrõnõst, ǭrõnõst]
     ǭʼrõn+N+Pl+Nom: [ǭʼrõnd, ǭrõnd]
     ǭʼrõn+N+Pl+Gen: [ǭʼrõnd, ǭrõnd]
     ǭʼrõn+N+Pl+Par: [ǭʼriņi, ǭriņi]
     ǭʼrõn+N+Pl+Dat: [ǭʼrõndõn, ǭrõndõn]
     ǭʼrõn+N+Pl+Ins: [ǭʼrõndõks, ǭrõndõks]
     ǭʼrõn+N+Pl+Ill: [ǭʼriņiž, ǭriņiž]
     ǭʼrõn+N+Pl+Ela: [ǭʼriņist, ǭriņist]
